Washington statutes.
RCW 39.23.005

Declaration of intent.

It is the intent of the legislature to encourage municipalities to purchase products and/or services manufactured or provided by sheltered workshops and programs of the department of social and health services which operate facilities serving persons with disabilities and disadvantaged individuals.

[ 2020 c 274 s 19; 1975 c 20 s 1.]